West Virginia, session 2025, SB377.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 20, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (schedule of fees, 3 CSR 06), is authorized.